Illinois, session 104th, SB1382.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Motor Fuel Tax Law is amended by changing 5Sections 1.1 and 13 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 505/1.1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 417.1)7    Sec. 1.1. "Motor Fuel" means all volatile and inflammable 8substances (whether in liquid or gaseous form) that are 9liquids produced, blended or compounded for the purpose of, or 10that which are suitable or practicable for, operating motor 11vehicles. Among other things, "Motor Fuel" includes "Special 12Fuel" as defined in Section 1.13 of this Act.13(Source: Laws 1963, p. 1557.) 14    (35 ILCS 505/13)  (from Ch. 120, par. 429)15    Sec. 13. Refund of tax paid. Any person other than a 16distributor or supplier, who loses motor fuel through any 17cause or uses motor fuel (upon which he has paid the amount 18required to be collected under Section 2 of this Act) for any 19purpose other than operating a motor vehicle upon the public 20highways or waters, shall be reimbursed and repaid the amount 21so paid.22    Any person who purchases motor fuel in Illinois and uses   SB1382- 2 -LRB104 03440 HLH 16962 b1that motor fuel in another state and that other state imposes a 2tax on the use of such motor fuel shall be reimbursed and 3repaid the amount of Illinois tax paid under Section 2 of this 4Act on the motor fuel used in such other state. Reimbursement 5and repayment shall be made by the Department upon receipt of 6adequate proof of taxes directly paid to another state and the 7amount of motor fuel used in that state.8    Claims based in whole or in part on taxes paid to another 9state shall include (i) a certified copy of the tax return 10filed with such other state by the claimant; (ii) a copy of 11either the cancelled check paying the tax due on such return, 12or a receipt acknowledging payment of the tax due on such tax 13return; and (iii) such other information as the Department may 14reasonably require. This paragraph shall not apply to taxes 15paid on returns filed under Section 13a.3 of this Act.16    Any person who purchases motor fuel use tax decals as 17required by Section 13a.4 and pays an amount of fees for such 18decals that exceeds the amount due shall be reimbursed and 19repaid the amount of the decal fees that are deemed by the 20department to be in excess of the amount due. Alternatively, 21any person who purchases motor fuel use tax decals as required 22by Section 13a.4 may credit any excess decal payment verified 23by the Department against amounts subsequently due for the 24purchase of additional decals, until such time as no excess 25payment remains. 26    Claims for such reimbursement must be made to the   SB1382- 3 -LRB104 03440 HLH 16962 b1Department of Revenue, duly verified by the claimant (or by 2the claimant's legal representative if the claimant has died 3or become a person under legal disability), upon forms 4prescribed by the Department. The claim must state such facts 5relating to the purchase, importation, manufacture or 6production of the motor fuel by the claimant as the Department 7may deem necessary, and the time when, and the circumstances 8of its loss or the specific purpose for which it was used (as 9the case may be), together with such other information as the 10Department may reasonably require. No claim based upon idle 11time shall be allowed. Claims for reimbursement for 12overpayment of decal fees shall be made to the Department of 13Revenue, duly verified by the claimant (or by the claimant's 14legal representative if the claimant has died or become a 15person under legal disability), upon forms prescribed by the 16Department. The claim shall state facts relating to the 17overpayment of decal fees, together with such other 18information as the Department may reasonably require. Claims 19for reimbursement of overpayment of decal fees paid on or 20after January 1, 2011 must be filed not later than one year 21after the date on which the fees were paid by the claimant. If 22it is determined that the Department should reimburse a 23claimant for overpayment of decal fees, the Department shall 24first apply the amount of such refund against any tax or 25penalty or interest due by the claimant under Section 13a of 26this Act.   SB1382- 4 -LRB104 03440 HLH 16962 b1    Claims for full reimbursement for taxes paid on or before 2December 31, 1999 must be filed not later than one year after 3the date on which the tax was paid by the claimant. If, 4however, a claim for such reimbursement otherwise meeting the 5requirements of this Section is filed more than one year but 6less than 2 years after that date, the claimant shall be 7reimbursed at the rate of 80% of the amount to which he would 8have been entitled if his claim had been timely filed.9    Claims for full reimbursement for taxes paid on or after 10January 1, 2000 must be filed not later than 2 years after the 11date on which the tax was paid by the claimant.12    The Department may make such investigation of the 13correctness of the facts stated in such claims as it deems 14necessary. When the Department has approved any such claim, it 15shall pay to the claimant (or to the claimant's legal 16representative, as such if the claimant has died or become a 17person under legal disability) the reimbursement provided in 18this Section, out of any moneys appropriated to it for that 19purpose.20    Any distributor or supplier who has paid the tax imposed 21by Section 2 of this Act upon motor fuel lost or used by such 22distributor or supplier for any purpose other than operating a 23motor vehicle upon the public highways or waters may file a 24claim for credit or refund to recover the amount so paid. Such 25claims shall be filed on forms prescribed by the Department. 26Such claims shall be made to the Department, duly verified by   SB1382- 5 -LRB104 03440 HLH 16962 b1the claimant (or by the claimant's legal representative if the 2claimant has died or become a person under legal disability), 3upon forms prescribed by the Department. The claim shall state 4such facts relating to the purchase, importation, manufacture 5or production of the motor fuel by the claimant as the 6Department may deem necessary and the time when the loss or 7nontaxable use occurred, and the circumstances of its loss or 8the specific purpose for which it was used (as the case may 9be), together with such other information as the Department 10may reasonably require. Claims must be filed not later than 11one year after the date on which the tax was paid by the 12claimant.13    The Department may make such investigation of the 14correctness of the facts stated in such claims as it deems 15necessary. When the Department approves a claim, the 16Department shall issue a refund or credit memorandum as 17requested by the taxpayer, to the distributor or supplier who 18made the payment for which the refund or credit is being given 19or, if the distributor or supplier has died or become 20incompetent, to such distributor's or supplier's legal 21representative, as such. The amount of such credit memorandum 22shall be credited against any tax due or to become due under 23this Act from the distributor or supplier who made the payment 24for which credit has been given.25    Any credit or refund that is allowed under this Section 26shall bear interest at the rate and in the manner specified in   SB1382- 6 -LRB104 03440 HLH 16962 b1the Uniform Penalty and Interest Act.2    In case the distributor or supplier requests and the 3Department determines that the claimant is entitled to a 4refund, such refund shall be made only from such appropriation 5as may be available for that purpose. If it appears unlikely 6that the amount appropriated would permit everyone having a 7claim allowed during the period covered by such appropriation 8to elect to receive a cash refund, the Department, by rule or 9regulation, shall provide for the payment of refunds in 10hardship cases and shall define what types of cases qualify as 11hardship cases.12    In any case in which there has been an erroneous refund of 13tax or fees payable under this Section, a notice of tax 14liability may be issued at any time within 3 years from the 15making of that refund, or within 5 years from the making of 16that refund if it appears that any part of the refund was 17induced by fraud or the misrepresentation of material fact. 18The amount of any proposed assessment set forth by the 19Department shall be limited to the amount of the erroneous 20refund.21    If no tax is due and no proceeding is pending to determine 22whether such distributor or supplier is indebted to the 23Department for tax, the credit memorandum so issued may be 24assigned and set over by the lawful holder thereof, subject to 25reasonable rules of the Department, to any other licensed 26distributor or supplier who is subject to this Act, and the   SB1382- 7 -LRB104 03440 HLH 16962 b1amount thereof applied by the Department against any tax due 2or to become due under this Act from such assignee.3    If the payment for which the distributor's or supplier's 4claim is filed is held in the protest fund of the State 5Treasury during the pendency of the claim for credit 6proceedings pursuant to the order of the court in accordance 7with Section 2a of the State Officers and Employees Money 8Disposition Act and if it is determined by the Department or by 9the final order of a reviewing court under the Administrative 10Review Law that the claimant is entitled to all or a part of 11the credit claimed, the claimant, instead of receiving a 12credit memorandum from the Department, shall receive a cash 13refund from the protest fund as provided for in Section 2a of 14the State Officers and Employees Money Disposition Act.15    If any person ceases to be licensed as a distributor or 16supplier while still holding an unused credit memorandum 17issued under this Act, such person may, at his election 18(instead of assigning the credit memorandum to a licensed 19distributor or licensed supplier under this Act), surrender 20such unused credit memorandum to the Department and receive a 21refund of the amount to which such person is entitled.22    For claims based upon taxes paid on or before December 31, 232000, a claim based upon the use of undyed diesel fuel shall 24not be allowed except (i) if allowed under the following 25paragraph or (ii) for undyed diesel fuel used by a commercial 26vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 1-111.8 of the   SB1382- 8 -LRB104 03440 HLH 16962 b1Illinois Vehicle Code, for any purpose other than operating 2the commercial vehicle upon the public highways and unlicensed 3commercial vehicles operating on private property. Claims 4shall be limited to commercial vehicles that are operated for 5both highway purposes and any purposes other than operating 6such vehicles upon the public highways.7    For claims based upon taxes paid on or after January 1, 82000, a claim based upon the use of undyed diesel fuel shall 9not be allowed except (i) if allowed under the preceding 10paragraph or (ii) for claims for the following: 11        (1) Undyed diesel fuel used (i) in a manufacturing 12    process, as defined in Section 2-45 of the Retailers' 13    Occupation Tax Act, wherein the undyed diesel fuel becomes 14    a component part of a product or by-product, other than 15    fuel or motor fuel, when the use of dyed diesel fuel in 16    that manufacturing process results in a product that is 17    unsuitable for its intended use or (ii) for testing 18    machinery and equipment in a manufacturing process, as 19    defined in Section 2-45 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax 20    Act, wherein the testing takes place on private property. 21        (2) Undyed diesel fuel used by a manufacturer on 22    private property in the research and development, as 23    defined in Section 1.29, of machinery or equipment 24    intended for manufacture. 25        (3) Undyed diesel fuel used by a single unit 26    self-propelled agricultural fertilizer implement,   SB1382- 9 -LRB104 03440 HLH 16962 b1    designed for on and off road use, equipped with flotation 2    tires and specially adapted for the application of plant 3    food materials or agricultural chemicals. 4        (4) Undyed diesel fuel used by a commercial motor 5    vehicle for any purpose other than operating the 6    commercial motor vehicle upon the public highways. Claims 7    shall be limited to commercial motor vehicles that are 8    operated for both highway purposes and any purposes other 9    than operating such vehicles upon the public highways. 10        (5) Undyed diesel fuel used by a unit of local 11    government in its operation of an airport if the undyed 12    diesel fuel is used directly in airport operations on 13    airport property. 14        (6) Undyed diesel fuel used by refrigeration units 15    that are permanently mounted to a semitrailer, as defined 16    in Section 1.28 of this Law, wherein the refrigeration 17    units have a fuel supply system dedicated solely for the 18    operation of the refrigeration units. 19        (7) Undyed diesel fuel used by power take-off 20    equipment as defined in Section 1.27 of this Law.21        (8) Beginning on the effective date of this amendatory 22    Act of the 94th General Assembly, undyed diesel fuel used 23    by tugs and spotter equipment to shift vehicles or parcels 24    on both private and airport property. Any claim under this 25    item (8) may be made only by a claimant that owns tugs and 26    spotter equipment and operates that equipment on both   SB1382- 10 -LRB104 03440 HLH 16962 b1    private and airport property. The aggregate of all credits 2    or refunds resulting from claims filed under this item (8) 3    by a claimant in any calendar year may not exceed 4    $100,000. A claim may not be made under this item (8) by 5    the same claimant more often than once each quarter. For 6    the purposes of this item (8), "tug" means a vehicle 7    designed for use on airport property that shifts 8    custom-designed containers of parcels from loading docks 9    to aircraft, and "spotter equipment" means a vehicle 10    designed for use on both private and airport property that 11    shifts trailers containing parcels between staging areas 12    and loading docks. 13    Any person who has paid the tax imposed by Section 2 of 14this Law upon undyed diesel fuel that is unintentionally mixed 15with dyed diesel fuel and who owns or controls the mixture of 16undyed diesel fuel and dyed diesel fuel may file a claim for 17refund to recover the amount paid. The amount of undyed diesel 18fuel unintentionally mixed must equal 500 gallons or more. Any 19claim for refund of unintentionally mixed undyed diesel fuel 20and dyed diesel fuel shall be supported by documentation 21showing the date and location of the unintentional mixing, the 22number of gallons involved, the disposition of the mixed 23diesel fuel, and any other information that the Department may 24reasonably require. Any unintentional mixture of undyed diesel 25fuel and dyed diesel fuel shall be sold or used only for 26non-highway purposes.  SB1382- 11 -LRB104 03440 HLH 16962 b1    The Department shall promulgate regulations establishing 2specific limits on the amount of undyed diesel fuel that may be 3claimed for refund.4    For purposes of claims for refund, "loss" means the 5reduction of motor fuel resulting from fire, theft, spillage, 6spoilage, leakage, or any other provable cause, but does not 7include a reduction resulting from evaporation, or shrinkage 8due to temperature variations. In the case of losses due to 9fire or theft, the claimant must include fire department or 10police department reports and any other documentation that the 11Department may require. 12    For purposes of claims for refund, "any purpose other than 13operating a motor vehicle upon the public highways" refers to 14the specific purpose for which the motor vehicle was used and 15does not refer to the specific location where the motor fuel 16was used. Incidental use of motor fuel on private roads or 17private highways in the operation of a motor vehicle does not 18constitute a "purpose other than operating a motor vehicle 19upon the public highways" and does not form a basis for a claim 20under this Section. The provisions of this amendatory Act of 21the 104th General Assembly are declaratory of existing law as 22to the meaning and scope of this claim for refund. 23(Source: P.A. 100-1171, eff. 1-4-19.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law, except that the changes made to Section 1.1 of 26the Motor Fuel Tax Law take effect January 1, 2026.